pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior: Desportos náuticos e aquáticos; Campismo e caminhada; Escalada; Ciclismo; Equestre; Pesca; Equipamento de prospeção e lavagem de ouro; Golfe; Asa-delta e paraquedismo; Caça e tiro; Acessórios para sistema de hidratação; Sistemas de hidratação; Patinagem com patins em linha e de 4 rodas; Kite Buggying; Jogos de exterior; Scooters; Cera para skate; Skate; Atividades e desportos de inverno
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor: Sport acquatici; Campeggio e trekking; Arrampicata; Ciclismo; Equitazione; Pesca; Attrezzatura per la ricerca e il setacciamento dell'oro; Golf; Paracadutismo e volo libero; Caccia e tiro a segno; Accessori per sistemi di idratazione; Zaini e borse portabevande; Pattinaggio in linea e tradizionale; Kite buggying; Giochi all'aperto; Scooter; Cera per skateboard; Skateboarding; Sport e attività invernali
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션: 보트 놀이/수상 스포츠; 캠핑/하이킹; 등반; 사이클링; 승마; 낚시; 금 탐사 및 사금 채취 장비; 골프; 행글라이딩/스카이다이빙; 사냥/사격; 수분공급 시스템 부대용품; 수분공급 시스템; 인라인/롤러 스케이팅; 카이트 버깅; 야외 놀이; 씽씽이; 스케이트보드 왁스; 스케이트보딩; 겨울 스포츠/액티비티
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás: Csónakázás és vízi sportok; Kemping és túrázás; Mászás; Kerékpározás; Lovaglás; Horgászat; Aranymosó és -kutató felszerelések; Golf; Sárkányrepülés és ejtőernyős ugrás; Vadászat és lövészet; Hidratációsrendszer-kiegészítők; Hidratációs rendszerek; Inline- és görkorcsolya; Kite Buggying; Szabadtéri játékok; Motoros rollerek; Gördeszkaviasz; Gördeszkázás; Téli sportok és tevékenységek
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre: Canoagem e esportes aquáticos; Acampamento e caminhada; Alpinismo; Ciclismo; Esportes equestres; Pesca; Equipamentos de prospecção e garimpo de ouro; Golf; Asa-delta e paraquedismo; Caça e tiro; Acessórios para sistemas de hidratação; Pacotes e bolsas de hidratação; Patinação inline e sobre rodas; Kitebuggying; Jogos ao ar livre; Motonetas; Cera para skate; Skate; Esportes e atividades de inverno
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie: Boten en watersport; Kamperen en wandelen; Klimmen; Fietsen; Paardensport; Vissen; Uitrusting voor goudzoeken en goudwassen; Golf; Hanggliding en skydiving; Jagen en schieten; Accessoires voor hydratatiesystemen; Drinkrugzakken en -tassen; Inlineskaten en rollerskaten; Buggyvliegeren; Buitenspelen; Scooterrijden; Skateboardwax; Skateboarden; Wintersport en -activiteiten
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity: Lodě a vodní sporty; Kempování a turistika; Lezectví; Cyklistika; Jezdectví; Rybaření; Vybavení na hledání a rýžování zlata; Golf; Závěsné létání a parašutismus; Lov a střelba; Camel bagy a vaky na vodu – příslušenství; Camel bagy a vaky na vodu; In-line a kolečkové brusle; Kitebuggying; Zahradní a venkovní hry; Koloběžky a skútry; Vosky na skateboard; Skateboardové vybavení; Zimní sporty a aktivity
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter: Båt- och vattensporter; Camping, vandring och backpacking; Klättring; Cykling; Hästsport; Fiske; Utrustning för guldvaskning och guldprospektering; Golf; Flygsport; Jakt och skytte; Tillbehör till hydreringssystem; Hydreringssystem; Inline- och rullskridskoåkning; Kitebuggying; Utomhuslek; Skotrar; Skateboardvax; Skateboardåkning; Vintersporter och -aktiviteter
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke: Plaukiojimas valtimis ir vandens sportas; Stovyklavimas ir žygiai; Laipiojimas; Dviračių sportas; Jojimo sportas; Žvejyba; Aukso paieškos ir plovimo įranga; Golfas; Sklandymas ir parašiutizmas; Medžioklė ir šaudymas; Hidracijos sistemų priedai; Hidracijos sistemos; Ratukinių pačiūžų ir riedučių sportas; Aitvaro traukiamų vežimėlių sportas; Lauko žaidimai; Paspirtukai; Riedlenčių vaškas; Riedlenčių sportas; Žiemos sportas ir veikla
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒: 水上運動; 露營和健行; 攀爬運動; 單車; 馬術運動; 釣魚; 淘金設備; 高爾夫球; 懸掛式滑翔/跳傘; 打獵和射擊; 水袋背包配件; 水袋背包; 直排輪/雙排輪; 越野車放風箏; 戶外遊戲; 滑板車; 滑板蠟; 滑板用品; 冬季運動
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής: Ναυσιπλοΐα & θαλάσσια σπορ; Κατασκήνωση & πεζοπορία; Αναρρίχηση; Ποδηλασία; Ιππασία; Ψάρεμα; Εξοπλισμός αναζήτησης και κοσκινίσματος χρυσού; Γκολφ; Αιωροπτερισμός & ελεύθερη πτώση; Κυνήγι & σκοποβολή; Αξεσουάρ συστήματος ενυδάτωσης; Συστήματα ενυδάτωσης; Πατινάζ εντός & εκτός δρόμου; Kite Buggying; Παιχνίδια εξωτερικού χώρου; Μοτοποδήλατα (Riding Scooters); Κερί για skateboard; Σκέιτμπορντ; Χειμερινά αθλήματα & δραστηριότητες
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито: Плаване с лодка и водни спортове; Къмпинг и туризъм; Катерене; Колоездене; Конен спорт; Риболов; Оборудване за търсене и промиване на злато; Голф; Делтапланеризъм и скачане с парашут; Лов и стрелба; Аксесоари за хидратиращи системи; Системи за хидратация; Каране на ролери и ролкови кънки; Kайт бъги; Игри на открито; Каране на тротинетки; Восък за скейтборд; Скейтборд; Зимни спортове и дейности
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy: Člnkovanie a vodné športy; Kempovanie a turistika; Horolezectvo; Bicyklovanie; Jazdectvo; Rybolov; Vybavenie na vyhľadávanie a rýžovanie zlata; Golf; Závesné lietanie a parašutizmus; Poľovníctvo a streľba; Príslušenstvo hydratačného systému; Hydratačné systémy; Jazda na inline a kolieskových korčuliach; Buggykiting; Exteriérové hry; Kolobežky; Vosk na skateboard; Skateboarding; Zimné športy a aktivity
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション: ウォータースポーツ・アクティビティ; キャンプ ・ハイキング; クライミング; サイクリング; 乗馬; 釣り; 砂金採り・探鉱用品; ゴルフ; ハンググライダー・スカイダイビング; 狩猟・射撃; ハイドレーションシステム関連用品; ハイドレーションシステム; インラインスケート・ローラースケート; カイトバギー用品; 屋外ゲーム; キックスクーター; スケートボードワックス; スケートボード; ウィンタースポーツ
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation: Boating & Water Sports; Camping & Hiking; Climbing; Cycling; Equestrian; Fishing; Gold Prospecting & Panning Equipment; Golf; Hang Gliding & Skydiving; Hunting & Shooting; Hydration System Accessories; Hydration Systems; Inline & Roller Skating; Kite Buggying; Outdoor Games; Riding Scooters; Skateboard Wax; Skateboarding; Winter Sports & Activities
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲: 划船/水上运动; 野营与远足; 攀岩用品; 自行车用品; 马术用品; 钓鱼; 探金和淘金设备; 高尔夫用品; 悬挂式滑翔/跳伞; 打猎与射击; 水袋系统配件; 水袋系统; 直排轮滑/四轮旱冰; 风筝车用品; 户外游戏; 滑板车; 滑板蜡; 滑板; 冬季运动与活动
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten: Boot- & Wassersport; Camping & Wandern; Klettern; Radfahren; Reitsportzubehör; Angeln; Ausrüstung zum Goldwaschen & -schürfen; Golf; Drachenfliegen & Fallschirmspringen; Jagen und Schießen; Trinksystem-Zubehör; Trinksystemrucksäcke & -taschen; Skaten; Kitebuggying; Spiele im Freien; Roller; Skateboard-Wachs; Skateboarden; Wintersport & -Aktivitäten
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber: Plimbări cu barca și sporturi nautice; Camping și drumeții; Alpinism; Ciclism; Echitație; Pescuit; Echipamente pentru prospectarea și spălarea aurului; Golf; Deltaplane și parașutism; Vânătoare și tir; Accesorii pentru sistem de hidratare; Sisteme de hidratare; Patinaj cu role în linie și patinaj cu rotile; Kite Buggying; Jocuri în aer liber; Scutere pentru grădinărit; Ceară pentru skateboard; Skateboarding; Activități și sporturi de iarnă
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem: Plovba in vodni športi; Kampiranje in pohodništvo; Plezanje; Kolesarjenje; Jahanje; Ribolov; Oprema za iskanje in izpiranje zlata; Golf; Jadralno zmajarstvo in padalstvo; Lov in streljanje; Dodatki za hidracijske sisteme; Hidracijski sistemi; Rolanje in kotalkanje; Kite Buggying; Igre na prostem; Skiroji; Vosek za rolke; Rolkanje; Zimski športi in dejavnosti
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri: Kayıkçılık ve Su Sporları; Kampçılık ve Doğa Yürüyüşü; Tırmanış; Bisiklet; Binicilik; Balıkçılık; Altın arama ve eleme ekipmanları; Golf; Yelken Kanat ve Serbest Paraşüt; Avcılık ve Atıcılık; Sulama Sistemi Aksesuarları; Hidrasyon Sistemleri; Inline ve Roller Paten; Kite Buggy; Açık Hava Sporları; Scooter Motorlar; Kaykay mumu; Kaykay Tahtası; Kış Sporları ve Aktiviteleri
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе: Гребля и водные виды спорта; Кемпинги и походы; Скалолазание; Езда на велосипеде; Конный спорт; Рыбалка; Оборудование для поиска и промывки золота; Гольф; Дельтапланеризм и прыжки с парашютом; Охота и стрельба; Аксессуары для питьевых систем; Питьевые системы; Катание на роликах; Лендкайтинг; Игры на открытом воздухе; Катание на самокатах; Воск для скейтбординга; Скейтбординг; Зимние виды спорта и игры
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom: Plovidba i vodeni sportovi; Kampiranje i planinarenje; Penjanje; Biciklizam; Jahanje; Ribolov; Oprema za traženje i ispiranje zlata; Golf; Letenje zmajem i padobranom; Lov i streljaštvo; Pribor za sustav hidratacije; Sustavi za hidrataciju; Rolanje i koturanje; Vožnja kite buggy vozilima; Igre na otvorenom; Romobili za vožnju; Vosak za skateboard; Skejtanje; Zimski sportovi i aktivnosti
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air: Plaisance et sports nautiques; Camping et randonnée; Escalade; Vélo; Équitation; Pêche; Matériel de prospection et d’orpaillage; Golf; Deltaplane et parachutisme; Chasse et tir; Accessoires pour systèmes d'hydratation; Systèmes d'hydratation; Patin à roulettes et roller; Char à cerf-volant; Jeux d'extérieur; Trottinettes; Cire de skateboard; Skateboarding; Activités et sports d'hiver
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời: Chèo thuyền và thể thao dưới nước; Cắm trại & Đi bộ đường dài; Leo núi; Đạp xe; Cưỡi ngựa; Câu cá; Thiết bị thăm dò và đãi vàng; Gôn; Dù lượn và nhảy dù; Săn bắn; Phụ kiện bộ trữ và cấp nước cá nhân cho các hoạt động ngoài trời; Bộ trữ và cấp nước cá nhân cho các hoạt động ngoài trời; Trượt pa-tanh và pa-tanh một hàng; Thả diều trên xe buggy; Trò chơi ngoài trời; Xe trượt scooter đạp chân; Sáp trượt ván; Trượt ván; Hoạt động và thể thao mùa đông
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง: กีฬาทางเรือและทางน้ำ; การตั้งแคมป์และเดินเขา; ปีนเขา; ปั่นจักรยาน; การขี่ม้า; การตกปลา; อุปกรณ์ร่อนและค้นหาแร่ทองคำ; กอล์ฟ; ร่มร่อนและการเหินเวหา; การล่าสัตว์และยิงปืน; อุปกรณ์เป้น้ำ; ระบบน้ำดื่ม; อินไลน์และโรลเลอร์สเกต; การขี่รถที่ขับเคลื่อนด้วยว่าว; เกมกลางแจ้ง; สกูทเตอร์สำหรับขับขี่; แว็กซ์สเก็ตบอร์ด; การเล่นสเกตบอร์ด; กีฬาและกิจกรรมในฤดูหนาว
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv: Båt og vannsport; Camping og fjellvandring; Klatring; Sykling; Hestesport; Fisking; Utstyr for gullgraving og -vasking; Golf; Hanggliding og fallskjermhopping; Jakt og skyting; Tilbehør for hydreringssystemer; Hydreringssystemer; Inline og rulleskøyter; Kite-buggying; Utendørsspill; Sparkesykler; Skateboardvoks; Skateboarding; Vintersport og aktiviteter
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu: Żegluga i sporty wodne; Camping i chodzenie po górach; Wspinaczka; Kolarstwo; Jeździectwo; Rybołówstwo; Sprzęt do poszukiwania i płukania złota; Golf; Paralotniarstwo i spadochroniarstwo; Myślistwo i strzelectwo; Akcesoria do systemów nawadniających; Akcesoria na wodę; Jazda na wrotkach i łyżworolkach; Buggykiting; Gry na świeżym powietrzu; Hulajnogi; Wosk do deskorolek; Jazda na deskorolce; Sporty zimowe i rekreacja zimą
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre: Deportes acuáticos y navegación deportiva; Camping y senderismo; Escalada; Ciclismo; Equitación; Pesca; Equipos de prospección y bateo de oro; Golf; Ala delta y paracaidismo; Caza y tiro; Accesorios para sistemas de hidratación; Sistemas de hidratación; Patinaje sobre ruedas y en línea; Kite buggy; Juegos al aire libre; Patinetes; Cera para patinetas; Skateboarding; Actividades y deportes de invierno
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv: Sejling og vandsport; Camping og vandreture; Klatring; Cykling; Dressur; Fiskeri; Udstyr til guldgravning og guldvaskning; Golf; Hanggliding og faldskærmsudspring; Jagt og skydning; Drikkesystemer – tilbehør; Drikkesystemer; Rulleskøjter og inlinere; Dragebuggy; Udendørsspil; Løbehjul; Skateboardvoks; Skateboarding; Vintersport og -aktiviteter
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet: Veneily ja vesiurheilu; Retkeily ja vaellus; Kiipeily; Pyöräily; Ratsastus; Kalastus; Kullanetsintä- ja huuhdontavarusteet; Golf; Riippuliito ja laskuvarjohyppy; Metsästys ja ammunta; Nesteytystarvikkeet; Nesteytys; Rullaluistelu; Kite Buggying; Ulkopelit; Potkulaudat; Skeittivahat; Rullalautailu; Talviurheilu ja -harrastukset